District of Columbia statutes.
32-415

Rules and regulations; delegation of authority.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue, and may amend from time to time, rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

By issuance of a Mayor’s Order, the Mayor may delegate the powers and duties assigned to the Mayor by this chapter.

Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-136, § 17, 31 DCR 5727

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1015.

Prior Codifications

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-136, see Mayor’s Order 86-9, January 16, 1986.

Delegation of Authority